Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.655.090

Statewide student assessment—Reporting requirements.

(1) By September 10, 1998, and by September 10th each year thereafter, the superintendent of public instruction shall report to schools, school districts, and the legislature on the results of the statewide student assessment.

(2) The reports shall include the assessment results by school and school district, and include changes over time. For the statewide student assessment, results shall be reported as follows:

(a) The percentage of students meeting the standards;

(b) The percentage of students performing at each level of the assessment;

(c) Disaggregation of results by at least the following subgroups of students: White, Black, Hispanic, American Indian/Alaskan Native, Asian, Pacific Islander/Hawaiian Native, low income, transitional bilingual, migrant, special education, and, beginning with the 2009-10 school year, students covered by section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act of 1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794); and

(d) A learning improvement index that shows changes in student performance within the different levels of student learning reported on the statewide student assessment.

(3) The reports shall contain data regarding the different characteristics of schools, such as poverty levels, percent of English as a second language students, dropout rates, attendance, percent of students in special education, and student mobility so that districts and schools can learn from the improvement efforts of other schools and districts with similar characteristics.

(4) The reports shall contain student scores on mandated tests by comparable Washington schools of similar characteristics.

(5) The reports shall contain information on public school choice options available to students, including vocational education.

(6) The reports shall be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's internet website.

(7) To protect the privacy of students, the results of schools and districts that test fewer than ten students in a grade level shall not be reported. In addition, in order to ensure that results are reported accurately, the superintendent of public instruction shall maintain the confidentiality of statewide data files until the superintendent determines that the data are complete and accurate.

(8) The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor the percentage and number of special education and limited English-proficient students exempted from taking the assessments by schools and school districts to ensure the exemptions are in compliance with exemption guidelines.

[ 2019 c 252 s 120; 2008 c 165 s 3; 1999 c 388 s 301; 1998 c 319 s 301. Formerly RCW 28A.630.889.]

NOTES:

Intent—2019 c 252: See note following RCW 28A.230.710.

Part headings not law—1998 c 319: See note following RCW 28A.300.320.